src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_spaalvas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
    
  Noun - spáálváš: # MLO, ok
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Nom: spáálváš
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Gen: spálváá
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Acc: spálváá
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Ill: [spálvážân, spáálvážân]
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Loc: spálváást
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Com: spálváin
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Abe: spálvááttáá
    spáálváš+N+Ess: [spálvážin, spáálvážin]
    spáálváš+N+Par: [spálvážid, spáálvážid]
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Nom: spálvááh
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Gen: spálvái
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Acc: spálváid
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Ill: spálváid
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Loc: spálváin
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Com: [spálváiguin, spálváigijn]
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Abe: spálváittáá
